Rhode Island statutes. Title 12 Criminal Procedure
Chapter 12 Indictments, Informations and Complaints

12-12-1.
Repealed.

12-12-1.1.
Capital or life offenses.

An offense which may be punished by death shall be prosecuted by indictment. An offense which may be punished by a term of life imprisonment shall be prosecuted by indictment unless the defendant, with the consent of the attorney general and leave of the court, waives indictment, in which event it may be prosecuted by information.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 118, § 11.

12-12-1.2.
Felonies — Less than capital or life, penalty.

Except for offenses punishable by death or by a term of life imprisonment or offenses arising in the land or naval forces or in the militia in actual service in time of war or public danger, an offense which may be punished by imprisonment for a term exceeding one year and/or by a fine exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000) may be prosecuted by indictment or information signed by the attorney general or one of the attorney general’s designated assistants.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 118, § 11; P.L. 1986, ch. 318, § 1.

12-12-1.3.
Lesser offenses, penalty.

An offense which may be punished by imprisonment for a term not exceeding one year or a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000) may be prosecuted by complaint.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 118, § 11; P.L. 1986, ch. 269, § 1.

12-12-1.4.
Contents of indictments, informations and complaints.

An indictment, information, or complaint shall be a plain, concise, and definite written statement of the offense charged. An indictment, information, or complaint which provides the defendant and the court with adequate notice of the offense being charged shall be sufficient if the offense is charged either:

By using the name given to the offense in terms of either the common law or by statute; or

By stating the definition of the offense in terms of substantially the same meaning.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 118, § 11.

12-12-1.5.
Informations — Exhibits to be attached.

When an offense is prosecuted by information, the attorney general shall attach to the information any exhibits, such as affidavits sworn to before the attorney general or one of his or her designated assistants, documents, photographs, recordings, or other materials or copies of them, upon which the attorney general relies to demonstrate the existence of probable cause to believe that the offense charged in the information has been committed and that the defendant committed it.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 118, § 11.

12-12-1.6.
Defendant to receive copy of information.

A copy of the information and all exhibits appended to it shall be served on the defendant promptly after it is filed with the clerk of the superior court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 118, § 11.

12-12-1.7.
Motion to dismiss information.

Within thirty (30) days after a defendant is served with a copy of an information charging him or her with an offense, he or she may move in the superior court to dismiss the information on the ground that the information and exhibits appended to it do not demonstrate the existence of probable cause to believe that the offense charged has been committed or that the defendant committed it. Upon the filing of the motion to dismiss the court shall schedule a hearing to be held within a reasonable time.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 118, § 11; P.L. 2008, ch. 226, § 1.

12-12-1.8.
Hearing to determine probable cause.

At the probable cause hearing the information and exhibits appended to it shall be before the court. The defendant may call witnesses and may introduce evidence bearing on the question of the existence of probable cause to charge him or her. The state may not call witnesses, introduce evidence, or otherwise supplement the exhibits appended to the information unless the court grants leave to do so.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 118, § 11.

12-12-1.9.
Determining whether probable cause exists.

After conducting the hearing the court shall determine from an examination of the information and exhibits appended to it, and in light of any evidence presented at the hearing, whether there exists probable cause to believe that the offense charged has been committed and that defendant committed it. A finding of the existence of probable cause may be based in whole or in part upon hearsay evidence or on evidence which may ultimately be ruled to be inadmissible at the trial.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 118, § 11.

12-12-1.10.
Dismissal of information — Effect.

If the court dismisses the information on the ground that the state has not demonstrated the existence of probable cause to believe that the offense charged has been committed or that defendant committed it the state may not after dismissal proceed against the defendant for the same offense, unless:

On appeal the order of dismissal is reversed; or

The court, upon motion of the state and a finding of mistake, inadvertence, surprise, excusable neglect, the discovery of new evidence which by due diligence could not have been discovered at the time the hearing on probable cause was held, or any other reason justifying the relief, enters an order permitting the state to proceed against the defendant for the same offense.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 118, § 11.

12-12-1.11.
“Indictment” construed.

Whenever “indictment” appears in the general or public laws or in rules of court, it includes the expression “information filed by the attorney general or one of the attorney general’s designated assistants,” except where ascribing that meaning to the term “indictment” is inconsistent with the intent or the manner in which the term was used or otherwise is inappropriate.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 118, § 11.

12-12-2.
Process in fictitious name or by description.

In case the name of the person to be proceeded against is unknown, the indictment, information, complaint, warrant, or other criminal process may be found or issued against him or her by a fictitious name or by any description that the prosecutor or complainant may select, and the error or defect may be afterwards amended by the court.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 285, § 3; G.L. 1909, ch. 354, §§ 2, 3; P.L. 1915, ch. 1261, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 407, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 625, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

12-12-2

; P.L. 1974, ch. 118, § 11.

12-12-3.
Formal defects in process not ground for abatement or quashing.

No indictment, information, complaint or criminal process shall be abated or quashed for any want of form, or because it omits to allege that the offense was committed or the act was done “feloniously,” “burglariously,” “willfully,” “maliciously,” or with “malice aforethought,” “unlawfully,” “negligently,” or with “force and arms,” or because it omits to characterize similarly the manner of the commission of the offense, or because it omits to allege the means by which the offense was committed or omits to allege the time and place of the commission of the offense, unless the description, characterization, means, time, or place is an essential element of the offense; provided, that it contains such allegation of the offense that the accused is informed of the nature and cause of the accusation.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 285, § 4; G.L. 1909, ch. 354, § 4; G.L. 1909, ch. 354, § 3, as enacted by P.L. 1915, ch. 1261, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 407, § 3; P.L. 1932, ch. 1954, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 625, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

12-12-3

; P.L. 1974, ch. 118, § 11.

12-12-4 — 12-12-9.
Repealed.

12-12-10.
Variances of proof and immaterial mistakes.

A defendant shall not be acquitted or discharged on the ground of variance between the allegation and proof if the essential elements of the crime are correctly stated in the indictment, information, or complaint, unless the defendant is prejudiced in his or her defense by the variance. The defendant shall not be acquitted or discharged by reason of an immaterial misnomer of a third party, by reason of an immaterial mistake in the description of the property or its ownership, by reason of failure to prove unnecessary allegations in the description of the crime, or by reason of any other immaterial mistake in the indictment, information, or complaint.

History of Section.

G.L. 1909, ch. 354, § 4; P.L. 1915, ch. 1261, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 407, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 625, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

12-12-10

; P.L. 1974, ch. 118, § 11.

12-12-11.
Conditions not required to be negated in allegations.

An excuse, exception, or proviso which is not stated in the enacting clause of a statute creating a crime, or which is stated only by reference to other provisions of the statute, need not be negated in the indictment, information, or complaint unless it is necessary for a complete definition of the crime. If a statute which creates a crime permits an act, which is declared to be criminal, to be performed without criminality under stated conditions, the conditions need not be negated.

History of Section.

G.L. 1909, ch. 354, § 5; P.L. 1915, ch. 1261, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 407, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 625, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

12-12-11

; P.L. 1974, ch. 118, § 11.

12-12-12.
Description of written instruments.

If an allegation relative to a written instrument which consists wholly or in part of writing, print, or figures is necessary in any indictment, information, or complaint, the indictment, information, or complaint may describe the instrument by any name or designation by which it is usually known, or by its purport, without setting out a copy or facsimile of the whole or of any part; and no variance between the recital or description and the instrument produced at the trial shall be material if the identity of the instrument is evident and its purport is sufficiently described to prevent prejudice to the defendant.

History of Section.

G.L. 1909, ch. 354, § 6; P.L. 1915, ch. 1261, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 407, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 625, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

12-12-12

; P.L. 1974, ch. 118, § 11.

12-12-13.
Allegations as to form of money.

If any allegation relative to any bullion, money, notes, bank notes, checks, drafts, bills of exchange, obligations, or other securities for money, of any country, state, county, city, town, bank, corporation, partnership, or person is necessary in any indictment, information, or complaint, the indictment, information, or complaint may describe it as money to a certain amount without specifying any particulars, and this descriptive allegation shall be sustained by proof of any amount of bullion, money, notes, or other securities for money, although its particular nature shall not be proved.

History of Section.

G.L. 1909, ch. 354, § 7; P.L. 1915, ch. 1262, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 407, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 625, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

12-12-13

; P.L. 1974, ch. 118, § 11.

12-12-14.
Allegations as to statutory larceny.

In prosecutions under §§

11-41-3

,

11-41-4

, and

11-41-11

, it shall be sufficient to allege generally in the indictment, information, or complaint a stealing of money to a certain amount, or property of a certain value, without specifying any particulars of the stealing, and it shall be sufficient to maintain the charge in the indictment, information, or complaint, and it shall not be deemed a variance, if it is proved that any bullion, money, notes, bank notes, check, draft, bill of exchange, or other security or money, or other property of whatever amount, was stolen, embezzled, fraudulently appropriated, converted, or was obtained, received, taken or secreted by false pretenses or otherwise, with intent to cheat, defraud, embezzle, or fraudulently convert by the person prosecuted.

History of Section.

G.L. 1909, ch. 354, § 8; P.L. 1915, ch. 1261, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 407, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 625, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

12-12-14

; P.L. 1974, ch. 118, § 11; P.L. 1988, ch. 15, § 1.

12-12-15.
Allegations in perjury indictments or informations.

In every indictment or information for perjury or subornation of perjury, or incitement to perjury, it shall be sufficient to set forth the substance of the offense charged upon the defendant, and by what court or before whom the oath or affirmation was taken, averring the court or person to have had competent authority to administer it, together with the proper averment or averments to falsify the matter in which the perjury is assigned, without setting forth any part of any record or proceeding, other than as above mentioned, and without setting forth the commission or authority of the court, or person or persons before whom the perjury was committed or was agreed, promised, procured, or incited to be committed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 285, § 5; G.L. 1909, ch. 354, § 5; G.L. 1909, ch. 354, § 9; P.L. 1915, ch. 1261, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 407, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 625, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

12-12-15

; P.L. 1974, ch. 118, § 11.

Form of Action.

Indictment did not need to allege with particularity the form of the action in which the false testimony was given. State v. Miller,

26 R.I. 282

, 58 A. 882,

1904 R.I. LEXIS 70

(1904).

12-12-16.
Allegations as to property held jointly, in common, or by partners.

In every indictment, information or complaint for any felony or misdemeanor, whenever it shall be requisite to state the ownership of any property whatsoever, whether real or personal, which shall belong to or be in possession of more than one person, whether the persons are partners in trade, joint tenants, tenants in common, members of joint stock companies, or trustees, and whenever it shall be necessary to mention, for any purpose whatsoever, any partners, joint tenants, tenants in common, members of joint stock companies, or trustees, it shall be sufficient to name one of the persons and state the property to belong to the person so named the and another or others, as the case may be.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 285, § 6; G.L. 1909, ch. 354, § 6; G.L. 1909, ch. 354, § 10; P.L. 1915, ch. 1261, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 407, § 10; G.L. 1938, ch. 625, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

12-12-16

.

12-12-17.
Statute of limitations.

There shall be no statute of limitations for the following offenses: treason against the state; any homicide, arson, first-degree arson, second-degree arson, third-degree arson, burglary, counterfeiting, forgery, robbery, rape, first-degree sexual assault, first-degree child molestation sexual assault, second-degree child molestation sexual assault, bigamy; manufacturing, selling, distribution, or possession with intent to manufacture, sell, or distribute, a controlled substance under the Uniform Controlled Substance Act, chapter 28 of title 21; or any other offense for which the maximum penalty provided is life imprisonment.

The statute of limitations for the following offenses shall be ten (10) years: larceny under § 11-41-2 (receiving stolen goods), § 11-41-3 (embezzlement and fraudulent conversion), § 11-41-4 (obtaining property by false pretenses or personation), § 11-41-11 (embezzlement by bank officer or employee), § 11-41-12 (fraudulent conversion by agent or factor), and § 11-41-13 (obtaining signature by false pretenses), or any larceny that is punishable as a felony; any violation of chapter 7 of title 11 (bribery); any violation of §

11-18-1

(giving false document to agent, employee, or public official); perjury; any violation of chapter 42 of title 11 (threats and extortion); any violation of chapter 15 of title 7 (racketeer influenced and corrupt organizations); any violation of chapter 57 of title 11 (racketeer violence); any violation of chapter 36 of title 6 (antitrust law); any violation of § 11-68-2 (exploitation of an elder); any violation of § 11-41-11.1 (unlawful appropriation); any violation of § 11-18-6 (false financial statement to obtain loan or credit); any violation of § 19-9-28 (false statement to obtain a loan); any violation of § 19-9-29 (bank fraud); or any violation of § 11-18-34 (residential mortgage fraud).

The statute of limitations for any other criminal offense shall be three (3) years, unless a longer statute of limitations is otherwise provided for in the general laws.

Any person who participates in any offense, either as a principal accessory or conspirator, shall be subject to the same statute of limitations as if the person had committed the substantive offense.

The statute of limitations for any violation of chapter 18.9 of title 23 (refuse disposal), chapter 19 of title 23 (solid waste management corporation), chapter 19.1 of title 23 (hazardous waste management), chapter 12 of title 46 (water pollution), and chapter 13 of title 46 (public drinking water supply) shall be seven (7) years from the time that the facts constituting the offense or violation shall have become known to law enforcement authorities, unless a longer statute of limitations is otherwise provided for in the general laws.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 285, § 33; G.L. 1909, ch. 354, § 33; G.L. 1909, ch. 354, § 12; P.L. 1915, ch. 1261, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 407, § 12; G.L. 1938, ch. 625, § 12; P.L. 1950, ch. 2463, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

12-12-17

; P.L. 1974, ch. 118, § 11; P.L. 1981, ch. 75, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 62, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 195, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 15, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 535, § 2; P.L. 1990, ch. 284, § 2; P.L. 2014, ch. 270, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 310, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 133, § 2; P.L. 2017, ch. 146, § 2.

12-12-18.
Period of limitations extended by theft, loss or destruction of indictment or information.

If any indictment found or information filed within the time limited in and by this chapter shall be stolen, lost, or destroyed before a judgment shall have been rendered, a new indictment may be found or information filed for the same offense at any time within one year after the theft, loss or destruction of the original indictment or information.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 285, § 34; G.L. 1909, ch. 354, § 34; G.L. 1909, ch. 354, § 13; P.L. 1915, ch. 1261, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 407, § 13; G.L. 1938, ch. 625, § 13; G.L. 1956, §

12-12-18

; P.L. 1974, ch. 118, § 11.

12-12-19.
Repealed.

12-12-20.
Original and duplicates of charges to be filed.

In each and every criminal prosecution the original and duplicate of all complaints, warrants, informations, and/or indictments shall be filed with the appropriate court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 262, § 1; P.L. 1972, ch. 169, § 19; P.L. 1974, ch. 118, § 11.

12-12-21.
“Designated assistants” defined.

“Designated assistants” as used in this chapter means any one of the attorneys employed full time by the attorney general, including, but not limited to, the positions of assistant attorney general, special assistant attorney general, and special counsel, who has been designated by the attorney general as an attorney authorized to prosecute by information charging. The attorney general shall file notice of his or her designations with the secretary of state and the clerk of the superior court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1975, ch. 251, § 1.

12-12-22.
Arraignments and pleas — Notices to aliens.

At the time of criminal arraignment in the district or superior court, each defendant shall be informed that if he or she is an alien in the United States, a plea of guilty or nolo contendere may affect his or her immigration status. Failure to so inform the defendant at the arraignment shall not invalidate any action subsequently taken by the court.

Prior to accepting a plea of guilty or nolo contendere in the district or superior court, the court shall inform the defendant that if he or she is not a citizen of the United States, a plea of guilty or nolo contendere may have immigration consequences, including deportation, exclusion of admission to the United States, or denial of naturalization pursuant to the laws of the United States. Upon request, the court shall allow the defendant additional time to consider the appropriateness of the plea in light of this advisement.

If the court fails to so inform the defendant as required by this section, and the defendant later shows that his plea and conviction may have immigration consequences, the defendant shall be entitled, upon a proper petition for post-conviction relief, to have the plea vacated. Absent a record that the court provided the advisement required by this section, the defendant shall be presumed not have received the advisement.

The defendant shall not be required at the time of the plea to disclose to the court his or her legal status in the United States.

In the first week of January, 2001 and each year thereafter, the attorney general shall submit to the general assembly a list of cases in which a disposition was vacated pursuant to this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 123, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 500, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 501, § 1.